Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3215.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2-26-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 2-26 entitled "Hemp Growth
Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
2-26-4. Hemp an agricultural product.
Hemp is an agricultural product that may be grown as a crop, produced, possessed,
distributed, sold at retail, and commercially traded pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. Hemp
is subject to primary regulation by the commission department of business regulation (DBR);
provided, however, that the manufacture, distribution, sale, and service of THC-infused beverages
shall be governed by chapter 28.13 of title 21. The division may assist the commission DBR in the
regulation of hemp growth and production.
SECTION 2. Section 21-28.11-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 21-28.11 entitled "The
Rhode Island Cannabis Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
21-28.11-6. Cannabis advisory board.
(a) There is hereby established a cannabis advisory board, which is directed to work in
collaboration with the commission and the administrator of the cannabis office to advise and issue
recommendations on the use, commerce, regulation and effects of adult-use and medical cannabis
within the state. The advisory board shall additionally provide recommendations to the commission
regarding the administration and distribution of the social equity assistance fund established
pursuant to § 21-28.11-31.

(b) Membership. The cannabis advisory board shall consist of twenty (20) members, of
whom eleven (11) shall be voting members, and eight (8) nine (9) shall be non-voting members.
(1) The board shall consist of the following non-voting members: the secretary of
commerce or designee, the director of the department of labor and training or designee, the director
of the department of health or designee, the commissioner of education or designee, the
superintendent of public safety or designee, the director of the department of business regulation
or designee, the secretary of the Executive Office of Health and Human Services (EOHHS) or
designee, and a representative from the University of Rhode Island College of Pharmacy selected
by the commission.
(2) The board shall consist of the following voting members: a social equity officer, who
shall be appointed by the governor and serve as chair of the advisory board; two (2) additional
members to be appointed by the governor, one of whom shall represent the cannabis laboratory
testing industry, and one of whom shall be appointed in accordance with subsection (e) of this
section who has demonstrated experience in the manufacture, distribution, or retail sale of THC-
infused beverages; four (4) members to be appointed by the speaker of the house, one of whom
shall represent the cannabis cultivation industry, and three (3) of whom to be appointed in
accordance with subsection (e) of this section; and four (4) members to be appointed by the
president of the senate, one of whom shall represent the cannabis retail industry, and three (3) of
whom to be appointed in accordance with subsection (e) of this section.
(c) Term of voting members. The voting members shall be appointed to serve three (3)
year terms or until a successor is appointed. In the event of vacancy, the vacancy shall be filled in
the manner of the original appointment for the remainder of the term.
(d) Compensation. The appointed members and representatives shall receive no
compensation for their services.
(e) Representation. The members of the advisory board appointed by the governor, the
speaker of the house and the president of the senate pursuant to the provisions of the chapter shall
to the extent possible be individuals with expertise in the following areas: public and behavioral
health, substance use disorder treatment, effective rehabilitative treatment for adults and juveniles,
homelessness and housing, economic development, criminal justice, law enforcement and drug
policy. Further, the advisory board shall include representation from communities most impacted
by cannabis prohibition, such as individuals with prior drug convictions, the formerly incarcerated,
and representatives of organizations servicing communities impacted by past federal and state drug
policies.
(f) Quorum. To take action at a meeting, a majority of voting members of the board must
LC006276 - Page 2 of 18

be present and voting to constitute a quorum.
(g) Role and responsibilities. The advisory board shall:
(1) Consider all matters submitted to the board by the cannabis control commission;
(2) Advise and make recommendations to the commission on the preparation and
promulgation of guidelines, rules and regulations and any changes to guidelines, rules and
regulations that the advisory board deems fundamental or necessary for the commission’s review
and consideration;
(3) Provide analysis and recommendations to the commission relating to the administration
and distribution of the social equity assistance fund established pursuant to § 21-28.11-31;
(4) Conduct all meetings in compliance with chapter 46 of title 42 (the “open meetings
act”); and
(5) Report the findings, analysis, recommendations and conclusions adopted and approved
by the board to the commission within thirty (30) days of adoption and approval.
(h) Subcommittees. The chair may appoint subcommittees in order to develop and report
recommendations and to expedite the work of the board; provided, however, that the chair shall
appoint:
(1) A subcommittee on public health to develop recommendations on: products, labeling,
marketing, advertising, related public health issues; potency, which may include a recommended
maximum limit for individual servings of cannabis products; and packaging, which may include
the development and implementation of a public health warning to appear on cannabis products;
(2) A subcommittee on public safety and community mitigation to develop
recommendations on law enforcement, property, business, consumer, and any other issues that may
have an affect on the locality of the cannabis establishment and the surrounding environment;
(3) A subcommittee on the cannabis industry to develop recommendations on cultivation,
processing, manufacturing, transportation, distribution, seed-to-sale tracking systems and market
stability;
(4) A subcommittee on market participation to develop recommendations on minority and
veteran-owned businesses, local agriculture and growing cooperatives; and
(5) A subcommittee on social equity to develop recommendations on remedying the harm
to individuals directly and adversely impacted by the past enforcement of cannabis-related laws.
SECTION 3. Title 21 of the General Laws entitled "FOOD AND DRUGS" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 28.13
RHODE ISLAND HEMP THC BEVERAGE ACT
LC006276 - Page 3 of 18

21-28.13-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Hemp THC Beverage
Act.”
21-28.13-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Artificially-derived cannabinoid” means a cannabinoid that is created or modified after
extraction from hemp through a chemical reaction, other than decarboxylation or naturally
occurring isomerization resulting from the application of heat or light, that materially alters the
molecular structure of the cannabinoid. The term includes, but is not limited to,
tetrahydrocannabinols produced through the chemical conversion of cannabidiol (CBD), such as
delta-8-tetrahydrocannabinol (delta-8 THC) or delta-10-tetrahydrocannabinol (delta-10 THC),
unless the commission, by rule, determines that a specific artificially derived cannabinoid may be
safely manufactured and sold for human consumption in accordance with applicable law and
commission standards.
(2) “Business” means any individual or sole proprietorship, partnership, firm, corporation,
trust, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, joint stock company, joint venture,
association or other legal entity through which business for-profit or not-for-profit is conducted;
(3) “Cannabis retailer” or “marijuana retailer” means an entity licensed pursuant to section
28.11 of title 21;
(4) “Commission” means the Rhode Island cannabis control commission established by §
21-28.11-4;
(5) “Hemp” or “industrial hemp” means the plant cannabis sativa L. and any part of that
plant, including the seeds thereof and all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts,
and salts of isomers, whether growing or not, with a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of
not more than three-tenths percent (0.3%) on a dry weight or per volume basis regardless of
moisture content, and which satisfies the requirements of this chapter.
(6) “Hemp-derived THC” means tetrahydrocannabinol derived solely from hemp and
expressly excluding THC derived from cannabis.
(7) “Hemp-derived CBD” means cannabidiol extracted or derived from hemp that does not
itself produce intoxicating effects when consumed.
(8) “Independent testing laboratory” means a laboratory that:
(i) Does not have a direct or indirect interest in the entity whose product is being tested;
(ii) Does not have a direct or indirect interest in a facility that cultivates, processes,
manufactures, distributes, dispenses, or sells THC-infused beverages or infused beverage products
LC006276 - Page 4 of 18

in the state; and
(iii) Is accredited by a third-party accrediting body to ISO/IEC 17025 for the applicable
analytical methods used to test the product and otherwise meets any proficiency-testing, quality-
assurance, and reporting standards established by the commission by rule.
(9) “Infused-beverage endorsement” means an endorsement issued by the commission to a
licensed liquor retailer, cannabis retailer, hemp-consumables retailer, or licensed on-premise
server, or a person licensed or authorized by the commission to manufacture THC-infused
beverages, authorizing the holder to sell or serve THC-infused beverages to consumers in
accordance with this chapter. An infused-beverage endorsement shall not authorize wholesale or
distribution activities.
(10) “Licensed liquor retailer” means the holder of a Class A retailer’s liquor license in
good standing.
(11) “Licensed liquor wholesaler” means the holder of a wholesale Class A or wholesale
Class B liquor license in good standing.
(12) “Low-dose” means a THC-infused beverage labeled to contain not more than five
milligrams (5 mg) of total hemp-derived THC per container.
(13) “Manufacturing facility” means a facility licensed or otherwise authorized by the
commission for the production or manufacture of THC-infused beverages in accordance with this
chapter.
(14) “Multi-serving container” means a beverage container intended for repeated access
and multiple servings that includes clearly measurable servings, resealable packaging, and labeling
stating the amount of total hemp-derived THC per serving and per container.
(15) “Permissible variance” means ten percent (10%), or such other variance as the
commission may establish by rule for particular analytes or testing circumstances upon an
articulated scientific or analytical basis.
(16) “Registered on-premise server” means the holder of a Class B liquor license in good
standing that has received an infused-beverage endorsement from the commission authorizing the
sale or service of THC-infused beverages for on-premises consumption in accordance with this
chapter.
(17) “Registered retailer” means a licensed liquor retailer, cannabis retailer, or hemp
consumables retailer that has received an infused-beverage endorsement from the commission
authorizing the retail sale of THC-infused beverages in accordance with this chapter.
(18) “Single-serving container” means a beverage container intended to be consumed on a
single occasion and containing not more than five milligrams (5 mg) of total hemp-derived THC.
LC006276 - Page 5 of 18

(19) “Synthetic cannabinoid” means a substance with a similar chemical structure and
pharmacological activity to a cannabinoid, but which is not extracted or derived from hemp plants,
or hemp plant parts and is instead created or produced by chemical or biochemical synthesis.
(20) “Tax division” means the Rhode Island division of taxation.
(21) “THC-infused beverage” means a beverage product that:
(i) Is not an alcoholic beverage, as defined in title 3;
(ii) Is intended for human consumption;
(iii) Contains, or is advertised, labeled, or offered for sale as containing, not more than five
milligrams (5 mg) of total hemp-derived THC per container subject to § 21-28.13-6;
(iv) Is intended to be consumed as a beverage, including a ready-to-drink liquid and a
product intended to be dissolved, diluted, or mixed into a beverage prior to consumption, when
marketed and labeled as such; and
(v) May contain hemp-derived CBD or other hemp-derived cannabinoids permitted under
this chapter.
(22) “Universal THC symbol” means the ASTM International standard intoxicating
cannabinoid product symbol, ASTM D8441/D8441M, or a substantially similar symbol approved
by the commission by rule, indicating that a product contains intoxicating cannabinoids and is
intended for adult use only.
21-28.13-3. Purposes -- Rules of construction.
(a) This chapter shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes
and policies.
(b) The underlying purposes and policies of this chapter are:
(1) To promote temperance and the reasonable control of the traffic in intoxicating THC-
infused beverages;
(2) To protect the public health, safety, and welfare through the safe, regulated, and age-
restricted sale and service of THC-infused beverages, including by prohibiting the sale or service
of THC-infused beverages to persons under twenty-one (21) years of age;
(3) To establish a clear licensing, endorsement, registration, and distribution framework
process for THC-infused beverages through existing regulated channels, including licensed liquor
retailers, cannabis retailers, hemp-consumables retailers, licensed on-premise servers, licensed
manufacturers, and licensed liquor wholesalers, as applicable under this chapter;
(4) To utilize existing licensed and age-restricted retail channels, including cannabis
retailers, that are already subject to strict age-verification and compliance requirements for the sale
of adult-use products;
LC006276 - Page 6 of 18

(5) To integrate the distribution and sale of THC-infused beverages into the existing
alcoholic beverage system in a manner that preserves the integrity of the three (3) tier structure
while vesting the commission with authority over product safety, testing, labeling, consumer
protection, and enforcement;
(6) To establish a low dose, container-based regulatory framework for THC-infused
beverages that is practical to administer, clear to consumers, and capable of routine inspection and
enforcement in general retail settings;
(7) To establish standardized requirements for labeling, universal intoxicating-cannabinoid
symbols, batch-level traceability, independent laboratory testing, age verification, and product
warnings in order to reduce consumer confusion and support consistent compliance and
enforcement;
(8) To distinguish regulated, tested, and lawfully distributed THC-infused beverages sold
through licensed channels from unregulated or noncompliant intoxicating hemp products outside
such channels;
(9) To permit, under conditions established by the commission, limited on-premises service
and off-premises sales by licensed manufacturers of THC-infused beverages in a manner consistent
with supervised beverage-service models used for other regulated beverage producers; and
(10) To ensure that taxes, fees, and other revenues associated with THC-infused beverages
support licensing administration, compliance inspections, investigations, product testing,
enforcement, and consumer education.
(c) The effect of this chapter may not be varied by contract or agreement. Any contract or
agreement purporting to do so is void and unenforceable to that extent only.
(d) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize any activity prohibited under
federal law, including the Controlled Substances Act, nor to limit or restrict the authority of the
United States Food and Drug Administration.
(e) This chapter shall be applied in a manner that does not discriminate against interstate
commerce, and products lawfully manufactured outside this state shall be permitted on equal terms
with in-state products, provided such products comply with the requirements of this chapter and
rules promulgated hereunder.
(f) In the event of a conflict between this chapter and any other provision of state law
relating to hemp-derived consumable products, the provisions of this chapter shall control with
respect to the manufacture, distribution, sale, and service of THC-infused beverages.
21-28.13-4. Sale of THC-infused beverages -- Reporting -- Taxes -- Fees.
(a) No THC-infused beverage shall be sold, offered for sale, distributed, or served in this
LC006276 - Page 7 of 18

state unless the THC-infused beverage is:
(1) Sold or offered for sale on the premises of a registered retailer holding a valid infused-
beverage endorsement issued by the commission;
(2) Sold or served on the premises of a registered on-premise server holding a valid infused-
beverage endorsement issued by the commission;
(3) Sold by a manufacturer holding a valid infused-beverage endorsement issued by the
commission, but only to the extent authorized under subsection (e) of this section; or
(4) Distributed by a licensed liquor wholesaler registered with the commission in
accordance with this chapter. For avoidance of doubt, a cannabis retailer or marijuana retailer
authorized under this chapter to sell THC-infused beverages shall not otherwise be restricted from
engaging in any activity otherwise permitted under chapter 28.11 of title 21, except as provided in
this chapter.
(b) Any licensed liquor retailer, cannabis retailer, or hemp-consumables retailer may apply
to the commission for an infused-beverage endorsement authorizing the retail sale of THC-infused
beverages. An infused-beverage endorsement issued under this subsection shall authorize sale to
consumers only and shall not authorize wholesale distribution. The applicant shall submit to the
commission, in a form and manner prescribed by the commission:
(1) An application;
(2) An annual endorsement fee of five hundred dollars ($500); and
(3) Proof of tax compliance, including compliance with this chapter. For purposes of this
subsection, the commission may require proof of tax compliance by:
(i) A certification of compliance made under the penalty of perjury; or
(ii) A letter of good standing from the tax division. An infused-beverage endorsement
issued under this subsection shall authorize the retail sale of THC-infused beverages in sealed
containers for off-premises consumption. Online ordering and delivery shall be permitted only
where the sale is fulfilled by a licensed retailer, with age verification at the time of purchase and at
the time of delivery, and otherwise in accordance with commission rule consistent with the delivery
provisions of title 3.
(c) Any licensed liquor wholesaler shall be eligible to distribute THC-infused beverages in
the state. Distribution authority under this chapter shall be limited to holders of wholesale Class A
or wholesale Class B liquor licenses in good standing under title 3. Each licensed liquor wholesaler
distributing THC-infused beverages shall register annually with the commission and shall pay an
annual compliance fee of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). An applicant for registration
under this subsection shall demonstrate tax compliance to the commission, including compliance
LC006276 - Page 8 of 18

with this chapter. For purposes of this subsection, the commission may require proof of tax
compliance by:
(i) A certification of compliance made under the penalty of perjury; or
(ii) A letter of good standing from the tax division. A licensed liquor wholesaler registered
under this subsection shall maintain invoice records, lot and batch traceability, and access to
certificates of analysis for products distributed in this state in accordance with commission rules.
(d) Any holder of a Class B liquor license in good standing may apply to the commission
for an infused-beverage endorsement authorizing the sale or service of THC-infused beverages for
on-premises consumption and, upon approval, shall be deemed a registered on-premise server
under this chapter. THC-infused beverages sold by a registered on-premise server shall be sold
exclusively for consumption on the premises of such registered on-premise server. The applicant
shall submit to the commission, in a form and manner prescribed by the commission:
(1) An application;
(2) An annual endorsement fee of five hundred dollars ($500); and
(3) Proof of tax compliance, including compliance with this chapter. The commission shall
promulgate rules establishing minimum server training requirements for THC-infused beverages
consistent, where applicable, with the alcohol server training regulations as set forth in § 3-7-6.1,
including requirements relating to age verification, responsible service, delayed effects, consumer
warnings, and limits on intoxication. THC-infused beverages shall not be commingled with
alcoholic beverages in the same container or mixed drink.
(e) A person licensed or otherwise authorized by the commission to manufacture THC-
infused beverages may apply to the commission for an infused-beverage endorsement authorizing:
(1) The sale or service or THC-infused beverages for on-premises consumption at a
licensed manufacturing facility or tasting room approved by the commission; and
(2) The sale of sealed THC-infused beverages for off-premises consumption from such
premises. An applicant under this subsection shall submit to the commission, in the form and
manner prescribed by the commission:
(i) An application;
(ii) An annual endorsement fee of five hundred dollars ($500); and
(iii) Proof of tax compliance, including compliance with this chapter. The commission may
establish by rule reasonable conditions on sales authorized under this subsection, including
conditions relating to age verification, separation from alcoholic beverage service, premises
supervision, hours of sale, signage, training, and recordkeeping. THC-infused beverages sold
pursuant to this subsection shall not be commingled with alcoholic beverages in the same container
LC006276 - Page 9 of 18

or mixed drink.
(f)(1) Not later than August 1, 2026, each business that owns or possesses any THC-infused
beverage in this state shall prepare an inventory of all such products owned or possessed in this
state as of said date.
(2) Products lawfully manufactured or possessed in this state before August 1, 2026, may
be sold through December 31, 2026; provided that, such products comply with the labeling and
testing requirements of this chapter.
(3) Each business in possession of THC-infused beverages for sale at retail or wholesale
shall remit to the tax division all applicable excise taxes, beverage container taxes, and sales taxes
consistent with the assessment, payment, and collection of:
(i) Excise taxes under chapter 10 of title 3;
(ii) Beverage container taxes under chapter 44 of title 44; and
(iii) Sales taxes under chapter 18 of title 44.
(4) The division of taxation shall establish a commodity code for THC-infused beverages,
and such taxes shall be remitted according to the same process, frequency, and cadence applicable
to alcoholic beverages.
(5) For low-dose THC infused beverages, the excise tax rate shall be ten percent (10%) of
the wholesale cost.
(g) If any business fails to submit the inventory or remit the taxes required under subsection
(f) of this section on or before August 1, 2026, the commission may:
(1) Make a good faith estimate, based on the information reasonably available to the
commission, of the number of containers owned or possessed by such business in this state on
August 1, 2026; and
(2) Invoice such business for the taxes due under subsection (f) of this section.
(h) All fees and penalties collected under this section shall be deposited in the general fund;
provided, however, that ten percent (10%) of such fees and penalties shall be credited to a restricted
receipt account to be known as the THC-infused beverage enforcement fund. Monies in the fund
shall be used, subject to appropriation, for administration and enforcement of this chapter, including
product testing, compliance inspections, investigations, and public education related to THC-
infused beverages.
(i) If any business fails to submit required reports or pay the fees required under this
chapter, the commission may suspend, revoke, or place conditions upon any certificate, license,
permit, registration, endorsement, or other credential issued to or for such business.
(j) The commission shall promulgate rules necessary to implement this chapter consistent
LC006276 - Page 10 of 18

with protecting public health, preventing youth access, ensuring product safety, and maintaining a
transparent and accountable marketplace.
21-28.13-5. Purchase from licensed wholesalers -- Limited exception.
Except for THC-infused beverages manufactured by, and sold directly to consumers by, a
manufacturer holding a valid infused-beverage endorsement under § 21-28.13-4(e), all registered
retailers and registered on-premise servers authorized under this chapter shall purchase THC-
infused beverages only from a licensed liquor wholesaler registered under this chapter and holding
the applicable wholesale license under title 3.
21-28.13-6. Dosage limitations.
(a) A THC-infused beverage shall not contain more than five milligrams (5 mg) of total
THC per container.
(b) No single serving of a THC-infused beverage shall contain more than five milligrams
(5 mg) of total THC. The commission may establish by rule requirements governing multi-serving
containers, including labeling, demarcation of servings, and consumer instructions.
(c) The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations to enforce this section,
including:
(1) Permissible variance thresholds;
(2) Testing and verification requirements; and
(3) Civil penalties or fines for violations of this section.
(d) The commission shall establish, by rule, minimum testing panels including, at a
minimum, cannabinoids, pesticides, heavy metals, residual solvents, and microcontaminants,
together with sampling protocols and chain-of-custody requirements necessary to ensure the
accuracy, reliability, and reproducibility of test results.
21-28.13-7. Sale to minors prohibited.
(a) No THC-infused beverage may be sold or served to any individual under twenty-one
(21) years of age.
(b) Prior to completing a sale or service of a THC-infused beverage, a registered retailer or
registered on-premise server shall verify that the purchaser or consumer is at least twenty-one (21)
years of age in accordance with the proof of age requirements set forth in § 3-8-6.
(c) A registered retailer or registered on-premise server may seize a form of identification
set forth in § 3-8-6 if the retailer or server has reasonable grounds to believe that the form of
identification has been altered, falsified, or is being used in violation of law. Any form of
identification seized pursuant to this subsection shall be delivered to a law enforcement agency
within twenty-four (24) hours.
LC006276 - Page 11 of 18

(d) THC-infused beverages shall not be commingled with alcoholic beverages in the same
container or mixed drink.
(e) The commission may promulgate rules establishing additional age verification, point-
of-sale, and service requirements consistent with this chapter and title 3.
(f) Registered retailers and registered on-premise servers shall display clear and
conspicuous signage stating that THC-infused beverages are intended only for individuals twenty-
one (21) years of age or older.
21-28.13-8. Labeling requirements.
(a) A THC-infused beverage product regulated under this chapter shall bear a label that
contains, at a minimum:
(1) The business name, mailing address, and website of:
(i) The manufacturer or co-packer responsible for physical production of the beverage; and
(ii) The brand owner or other responsible business under whose name the product is
marketed or distributed.
(2) The name and address of the independent testing laboratory that performed the most
recent testing of the batch;
(3) The batch or lot number sufficient to enable traceability; and
(4) An accurate statement of the cannabinoid profile of the product, showing the total
amount of each cannabinoid present at or above the reporting threshold established by the
commission, expressed per serving and per container, together with the total cannabinoids and total
tetrahydrocannabinol (THC), within the permissible variance;
(5) A scannable barcode or quick-response (QR) code linking directly to a certificate of
analysis maintained by the commission, the manufacturer, or a designee of either;
(6) A universal symbol, if established by the commission, indicating that the product
contains intoxicating cannabinoids;
(7) The following warning statements in bold type:
(i) “For adults twenty-one (21) years of age and older.”
(ii) “Do not drive or operate machinery after consuming.”
(iii) “Effects may be delayed.”
(iv) “Not safe during pregnancy or breastfeeding.”
(v) “Keep this product out of reach of children.”
For products manufactured under a co-packing or contract-manufacturing agreement, the
label shall identify both the manufacturing facility and the brand owner as provided in subsection
(1) of this section, and shall state “Manufactured for [Brand Name] by [Manufacturer Name, City,
LC006276 - Page 12 of 18

State].”
(b) The information required in subsection (a) of this section may appear on an outer
package when the immediate container is too small to accommodate all required information;
provided that, the immediate container shall, at a minimum, display:
(1) The universal symbol required by subsection (a)(6) of this section, if applicable;
(2) The statement “21+”; and
(3) The total THC per container.
(c) The commission may authorize additional electronic or web-based disclosures by rule,
including through QR codes or similar technology; provided that:
(1) The linked page contains all information required by this section; and
(2) Such information remains publicly accessible for not less than twenty-four (24) months
following the product’s expiration date or final distribution, whichever is later.
(d) The label shall state: “This product has not been evaluated by the United States Food
and Drug Administration and is not intended to diagnose, treat, cure, or prevent any disease,” unless
the product has received approval from the United States Food and Drug Administration.
(e) All required label information shall be prominently and conspicuously displayed in a
manner that is easily legible and understandable to the consumer.
(f) The labeling shall not contain any statement or representation that a THC-infused
beverage is intended or effective for the prevention, treatment, or cure of any disease, or to affect
the structure or function of the human or animal body, unless such claim has been approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration.
21-28.13-9. Additional requirements.
(a) In addition to the testing and labeling requirements set forth in § 21-28.13-8, every
THC-infused beverage sold or offered for sale in this state shall comply with the product-safety,
packaging, and formulation standards of this section.
(b) THC-infused beverages shall not:
(1) Bear designs, names, cartoons, images, features, or marketing elements that the
commission determines are reasonably likely to appeal primarily to persons under twenty-one (21)
years of age;
(2) Be modeled after, or marketed in a manner that imitates, a brand of products or category
of product primarily consumed by or marketed to children;
(3) Be made by applying an extracted or concentrated hemp-derived cannabinoid to a
commercially available candy or snack food item;
(4) Be represented or packaged in a form substantively similar to a meat food product;
LC006276 - Page 13 of 18

poultry food product; or a dairy product;
(5) Contain any ingredient, other than a hemp-derived cannabinoid, that is not approved by
the United States Food and Drug Administration for use in food or beverage products;
(6) Be packaged in a manner that resembles the trademarked, characteristic, or product-
specialized packaging of any commercially available food product in a way that is likely to cause
consumer confusion;
(7) Be packaged in a container that includes a statement, artwork, symbol, or design that
could reasonably mislead a consumer to believe that the package contains anything other than a
THC-infused beverage.
(8) Use or display the same or a confusingly similar brand name, logo, or trade dress as an
alcoholic-beverage product regulated under title 3; provided, however, that an alcohol manufacturer
or wholesaler licensed under title 3 may use its existing corporate or brand name for a hemp-derived
or THC-infused beverage if the labeling, packaging, and marketing clearly distinguish the product
from alcoholic beverages in accordance with commission rules; or
(9) Be advertised or marketed in a manner that is false, misleading, or reasonably likely to
cause consumer confusion as to whether the product is an alcoholic beverage, a non-intoxicating
hemp product, or a product intended for persons under twenty-one (21) years of age.
(10) The commission shall establish by rule objective criteria and illustrative examples to
guide determinations under this subsection.
(c) In addition to the labeling elements required under § 21-28.13-8, each THC-infused
beverage shall clearly display on its container or outer package:
(1) The serving size and number of servings per container; provided, however, that for a
single-serving beverage the container shall be deemed one serving;
(2) A list of ingredients, including identification of any major food allergens declared by
name in accordance with 21 U.S.C. § 343(w);
(3) The following statement in bold, conspicuous type: “Keep this product out of reach of
children.”
(d) THC-infused beverages may contain delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol and other naturally
occurring cannabinoids derived from hemp plants or hemp plant parts. No THC-infused beverage
shall contain a synthetic cannabinoid or any artificially-derived cannabinoid unless the
commission, by rule and upon a finding of safety, stability, and suitability for human consumption
in beverage form, authorizes its use in beverages manufactured for human consumption. The
commission may establish by rule a list of approved cannabinoids and any concentration limits
necessary to protect consumer health.
LC006276 - Page 14 of 18

(e) A manufacturer authorized under this chapter may produce, possess, and store THC-
infused beverages formulated exclusively for lawful sale outside Rhode Island; provided that, such
products are clearly labeled “Not for sale in Rhode Island,” segregated from in-state inventory, and
documented in batch, lot, and manifest records identifying the lawful destination jurisdiction.
(f) Each manufacturer shall maintain procedures for product recalls, consumer complaints,
and adverse-event reporting consistent with commission rules. The commission may order a recall
of any THC-infused beverage that it determines poses a risk to public health or safety.
Manufacturers, wholesalers, and retailers shall maintain records sufficient to support product
traceability, recall execution, and inspection-ready verification of batch identity and certificate-of-
analysis access.
(g) The commission may establish by rule requirements governing retail placement, point-
of-sale identification, product segregation where necessary to prevent consumer confusion or youth
access, and other shelf-level safeguards consistent with this chapter.
21-28.13-10. Noncompliant products -- Enforcement.
(a) A product regulated under this chapter, including a THC-infused beverage, shall be
deemed noncompliant if it is offered for sale in this state, or manufactured, imported, distributed,
possessed, or stored with intent for sale in this state, in violation of any provision of this chapter or
rule promulgated hereunder including, but not limited to, where:
(1) It consists, in whole or in part, of any unsanitary, putrescible, or decomposed substance;
(2) It has been produced, prepared, packed, or held under unsanitary conditions whereby it
may have been rendered injurious to health, or whereby it may have been contaminated with filth;
(3) Its container is composed, in whole or in part, of any poisonous or deleterious substance
that may render the contents injurious to health;
(4) It contains any food additive, color additive, or excipient that has been found by the
United States Food and Drug Administration to be unsafe for human consumption;
(5) It contains an amount or percentage of cannabinoids that differs from the amount or
percentage stated on the label by more than the permissible variance;
(6) It contains an amount of tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) that exceeds the dosage limits
established in § 21-28.13-6;
(7) It contains mold, residual solvents, pesticides, fertilizers, heavy metals,
microcontaminants, or other contaminants in excess of action limits established by the commission
by rule;
(8) It has not been tested, labeled, packaged, or traceable in accordance with the
requirements of this chapter; or
LC006276 - Page 15 of 18

(9) It was tested by a laboratory that does not satisfy the requirements of this chapter or
any rules promulgated hereunder.
(b) A product regulated under this chapter shall be deemed noncompliant if its labeling,
packaging, advertising, or presentation is false, misleading, or otherwise violates the requirements
of this chapter or any rule adopted by the commission.
(c) The commission may infer, based on the totality of the circumstances, that any regulated
product present in this state, other than a product lawfully possessed for personal use, has been
manufactured, imported, distributed, possessed, or stored with intent for sale in this state, including
where:
(1) A product of the same type and brand has been offered for sale in the state on or after
the effective date of this chapter; or
(2) The product is in the possession of a person who has sold any regulated product in
violation of this chapter.
(d) The commission may enforce this section against any manufacturer, wholesaler,
distributor, retailer, on-premise server, or other person subject to this chapter, and may impose
administrative penalties, suspend or revoke endorsements, or registrations, issue cease-and-desist
orders, order recalls, quarantine or embargo products, and refer matters for civil or criminal
prosecution as appropriate. In exercising its enforcement authority under this chapter, the
commission shall prioritize protection of public health and safety, product traceability, and the
removal of noncompliant products from commerce.
(e) The commission and its authorized agents may enter and inspect, during normal
business hours, any facility, manufacturing premises, warehouse, vehicle, retail premises, on-
premise service premises, or other location used in the manufacture, storage, distribution, sale, or
service of THC-infused beverages, and may seize, embargo, quarantine, or otherwise detain any
product the commission reasonably believes to be noncompliant. The commission shall coordinate
inspection and enforcement activities with the department of business regulation and the
department of health, as appropriate, to avoid unnecessary duplication of effort and to ensure public
safety.
(f) The commission shall provide notice and an opportunity to be heard prior to the
imposition of any administrative penalty, suspension, or revocation, consistent with chapter 35 of
title 42.
21-28.13-11. Existing franchise laws.
(a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to repeal, amend, impair, or supersede any
existing beer or wine franchise law including, without limitation, chapter 13 of title 3. This chapter
LC006276 - Page 16 of 18

is intended to provide additional franchise-related protections and requirements applicable to THC-
infused beverages while leaving in effect and unchanged all otherwise applicable local and state
franchise laws relating to beer or wine franchises in effect on the effective date of this chapter.
(b) The provisions set forth in §§ 3-13-3 and 3-13-5 shall apply to all sales and distribution
arrangements for THC-infused beverages governed by this chapter including, without limitation,
prior notice of cancellation or termination of an agreement and prohibited supplier conduct, and
such provisions are hereby incorporated by reference as if fully set forth herein.
21-28.13-12. Exclusive jurisdiction.
Notwithstanding any agreement to the contrary between or among retailers, wholesalers,
commission licensees, department of business regulation licensees, manufacturers, or any other
person subject to this chapter, any dispute arising out of or relating to this chapter shall be governed
by the laws of the State of Rhode Island, and the state courts in Rhode Island shall have exclusive
jurisdiction over such dispute.
21-28.13-13. THC-infused beverage enforcement fund.
(a) There is hereby established within the cannabis control commission a restricted receipt
account to be known as the “THC-infused beverage enforcement fund.”
(b) The fund shall consist of all monies credited to it pursuant to § 21-28.13-4(h), and any
other monies made available by law.
(c) The fund shall be administered by the commission and shall be used solely for the
administration and enforcement of this chapter including, without limitation, product testing,
compliance inspection, investigations, enforcement activities, license administration, and consumer
education relating to THC-infused beverages.
(d) Any unexpended balance in the fund at the close of a fiscal year shall remain in the
fund and shall not revert to the general fund.
21-28.13-14. Severability.
If any provision of this chapter, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance,
is held invalid or unconstitutional, such invalidity or unconstitutionality shall not affect other
provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid or
unconstitutional provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared
to be severable.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect on August 1, 2026.
========
LC006276
========
LC006276 - Page 17 of 18